District of Columbia statutes.
14-103

Depositions for use in State and Territorial Courts.

When a commission is issued or notice given to take the testimony of a witness found within the District of Columbia, to be used in an action pending in a court of a State, territory, commonwealth, possession, or place under the jurisdiction of the United States, the testimony may be taken by leave of a judge of the United States District Court in like manner and with like effect as other depositions are taken in United States district courts, or by leave of a judge of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia in the manner prescribed by the rules of that court.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 518, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 552, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 143(1)

Cross References

Depositions in criminal cases, see § 23-108.
Depositions in Probate Court, see § 16-3110.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 14-103.
1973 Ed., § 14-103.